Massachusetts, session 194th, S2121.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following new section:- 
2  Section 65. Eelgrass shall be the official marine flora of the commonwealth.